Hawaii statutes.
[§211F-8] Business and industry evaluation
and priorities for job opportunity and economic development. The
corporation shall develop procedures to set priorities as to which types of
businesses and industries are most likely to provide significant opportunities
for economic development and diversification in the State, consistent with the
purposes of this chapter. This evaluation shall take into account the
guidelines provided by the state plan for economic development. Based on these
findings, the corporation shall establish targets by which the operations and
programs of the corporation shall be guided. [L 1990, c 110, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next